Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 4. General Provisions.

Sec. 08.98.250.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“accredited veterinary school” means a veterinary college or division of a university or college that offers the degree of Doctor of Veterinary Medicine, or its equivalent as determined by the board, and conforms to the standards required for accreditation by the American Veterinary Medical Association;

“animal” means any animal other than a human being including mammals, birds, fish, and reptiles, wild or domestic, living or dead;

“board” means the Board of Veterinary Examiners;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“opioid” includes the opium and opiate substances and opium and opiate derivatives listed in AS

11.71.140

and

11.71.160

;

“practice of veterinary medicine”

means for compensation to

diagnose, treat, correct, change, relieve, or prevent animal disease, deformity, defect, injury, or other physical or mental condition, including the prescription or administration of a drug, biologic apparatus, anesthetic, or other therapeutic or diagnostic substance;

use a manual or mechanical procedure for testing for pregnancy or correcting sterility or infertility; or

render advice or recommendation with regard to any matter listed in (i) or (ii) of this subparagraph;

means to represent, directly or indirectly, publicly or privately, an ability or willingness to do any act in (A) of this paragraph for compensation;

means to use a description, title, abbreviation, or letters in a manner or under circumstances tending to induce the belief that the person using it or them is qualified or licensed to do any act in (A) of this paragraph whether or not for compensation;

does not include, whether or not for compensation,

practices related to artificial insemination and the use of a title, abbreviation, or letters in a manner which induces the belief that the person using them is qualified to perform artificial insemination;

the practices of a farrier done in the performance of the farrier’s profession;

standard practices commonly performed on farm or domestic animals in the course of routine farming or animal husbandry, when performed by an owner or the owner’s employee unless ownership of the animal is transferred for the purpose of avoiding application of this chapter or the primary purpose of hiring the employee is to avoid application of this chapter;

“veterinary technician” means a person who performs functions delegated by a veterinarian licensed under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 91 SLA 1963; am § 60 ch 218 SLA 1976; am §§ 14, 26 ch 130 SLA 1980; am § 7 ch 128 SLA 1996; am § 34 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Reorganized in 1991 and 2019 to alphabetize the defined terms.

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, added (7) [now (5)].